Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB825.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 531. Double utility poles.(a) Declaration of purpose.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) The Commonwealth recognizes the temporary use of double utility poles as an operational necessity, but disfavors the long-term use or retention of double utility poles on public rights-of-way due to concerns regarding public safety, the efficient use of public easements, ratepayer, subscriber or taxpayer expense and streetscape aesthetics.1234567891011121314151617 (2) The Commonwealth, through the commission, has exercised reverse preemption over the rates, terms and conditions of the pole attachments on a public utility's infrastructure in accordance with 47 U.S.C. § 224 (relating to pole attachments) as implemented by the commission under 52 Pa. Code Ch. 77 (relating to pole attachments).(3) The migration of attached electric, telephone, cable or other infrastructure from jurisdictional damaged or outmoded utility poles to newly installed replacement utility poles is within the commission's jurisdiction.(4) An attached infrastructure owner that chooses to attach infrastructure to a public-utility-owned pole is within the commission's jurisdiction for purposes of subsection (b).(b) Rulemaking.--The commission shall commence rulemaking to amend 52 Pa. Code Ch. 77 to provide support for the coordination and compensation for pole attachment relocation and removal of damaged or unused utility poles, or remnants thereof, under the control of entities under commission jurisdiction and establish procedures for compensation, indemnification and expeditious removal of an abandoned pole attachment. In commencing the rulemaking, the commission shall, at a minimum, consider the following:(1) The duration, place and manner of acceptable use of a double utility pole.(2) A requirement that an attached infrastructure owner register with the commission annually and provide and maintain current contact information for a responsible point of contact and legal service agent in each public utility pole owner's service territory and identify the county, city, 20250HB0825PN0852 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 township and borough where the attached infrastructure owner has attached facilities on a public-utility-owned pole.(3) A procedure to allow a public utility pole owner to provide reasonable notice to an attached infrastructure owner of the requirement to migrate facilities to a newly installed replacement utility pole.(4) The establishment of a presumptively reasonable period for an attached infrastructure owner to migrate facilities to a newly installed replacement utility pole.(5) A procedure for a public utility pole owner and the pole owner's contractor to be compensated or indemnified for time, material costs and lost opportunity costs, including enforcement procedures if an attached infrastructure owner fails to act or remit payment in a timely manner, relating to removing and reattaching infrastructure not migrated:(i) after the presumptively reasonable period has elapsed; or(ii) in accordance with an order by a governing body that is outside the scope of, or in addition to, a contractual right of indemnification that the pole owner may have via license or joint use agreement.(6) A procedure for a public utility pole owner to determine that attached facilities have been abandoned and provisions for compensation of the public utility pole owner for the time, material costs and lost opportunity costs relating to the transfer or removal of the abandoned facilities of an attached infrastructure owner due to necessity or in accordance with an order by a governing body.(7) Authorizing a public utility pole owner to require a surety bond from an attached infrastructure owner to 20250HB0825PN0852 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reimburse the public utility pole owner for expenses incurred due to any of the following:(i) The relocation of the attached infrastructure owner's facilities. (ii) The removal of the attached infrastructure owner's facilities. (iii) The recertification of a preexisting violation caused by the attached infrastructure owner to accommodate a new attachment.(8) Supporting the expeditious removal of a double utility pole after the removal of all attached infrastructure.(9) Authorizing the imposition of civil penalties, in accordance with 66 Pa.C.S. § 3301(a) (relating to civil penalties for violations), against attached infrastructure owners that violate the commission's final-form regulations amending 52 Pa. Code Ch. 77 to implement this section.(c) Rulemaking procedures.--No later than 90 days from the effective date of this subsection, the commission shall commence an advanced notice of proposed rulemaking. No later than 180 days from the date of commencement of the advanced notice of proposed rulemaking, the commission shall submit a notice of proposed rulemaking to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin in accordance with the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law. No later than 18 months after publication of the notice of proposed rulemaking, the commission shall seek approval of the final-form regulations in accordance with the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act, and 20250HB0825PN0852 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(d) Nonrecoverable costs.--Costs incurred by a utility to transfer or remove facilities of third-party attachers under this section shall not be recoverable from ratepayers if the costs have been fully recovered from the attachers.(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Attached infrastructure owner." Either a public utility defined in section 102 (relating to definitions) attaching infrastructure to another public utility's pole or a nonutility entity attaching infrastructure to the poles of a public utility."Double utility pole." An area where a full or remnant part of a damaged or outmoded utility pole remains present or in service after the installation of a newly installed replacement utility pole because the attached electric, telephone, cable or other infrastructure has not migrated from the damaged or outmoded utility pole to the newly installed replacement utility pole. The term includes the situation where attached electric, telephone, cable or other infrastructure has been migrated, but the damaged or outmoded utility pole or remnant thereof remains in place."Public utility pole owner." A public utility defined in section 102.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0825PN0852 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627